Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.270

Town council—Oath—Meetings.

The town council shall meet in January succeeding the date of the general municipal election, shall take the oath of office, and shall hold regular meetings at least once each month at such times as may be fixed by ordinance. Special meetings may be called at any time by the mayor or by three councilmembers, by written notice as provided in RCW 42.30.080. No resolution or order for the payment of money shall be passed at any other than a regular meeting. No such resolution or order shall be valid unless passed by the votes of at least three councilmembers.

All meetings of the council shall be held at such places as may be designated by the town council. All final actions on resolutions and ordinances must take place within the corporate limits of the town. All meetings of the town council must be public.

[ 1993 c 199 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.270. Prior: (i) 1890 p 200 s 150; RRS s 9171. (ii) 1890 p 201 s 153, part; RRS s 9174, part.]

NOTES:

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.